Utah statutes.
31A-2-103.   Commissioner's appointees.

(1)  The commissioner may appoint up to three persons to assist the commissioner.  The commissioner may designate a person appointed under this section as a "deputy," "administrative assistant," "secretary," or any other title chosen by the commissioner.

(2)  Persons appointed under this section are exempt from career service status under Section 67-19-15 and serve at the pleasure of the commissioner.



Amended by Chapter 128, 1994 General Session

